Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.290

Development regulations to implement comprehensive plans—Siting of organic materials management facilities.

For cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, development regulations to implement comprehensive plans under RCW 35.63.100 that are newly developed, updated, or amended after January 1, 2025, must allow for the siting of organic materials management facilities in the areas identified by the county in which the city is located under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(i) to the extent necessary to provide for the establishment of the organic materials management volumetric capacity identified under RCW 70A.205.040(3)(a)(ii).

[ 2022 c 180 s 603.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Scope of authority of chapter 180, Laws of 2022—2022 c 180: See notes following RCW 70A.205.007.